Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5093.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43520. (1) Subject to other requirements of this part, the department may issue a hunting license to an adult who has a developmental disability, has a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, and is unable to obtain certification of completion of training in hunter safety, or to a minor child if all of the following requirements are met: (a) A parent or guardian of the individual applies for the license on behalf of the individual. (b) The parent or guardian represents that the requirements of section 43517, as applicable, will be complied with. (c) The license fee is paid. (2) An individual born after January 1, 1960 shall not purchase or attempt to purchase a hunting license, unless the individual presents proof of previous hunting experience in the form of a hunting license issued by this state, another state, a province of Canada, or another country or presents a certification of completion of training in hunter safety issued to the individual by this state, another state, a province of Canada, or another country. If an applicant for a hunting license does not have proof of such a previous license or a certification of completion of training in hunter safety, a person authorized to sell hunting licenses may issue a hunting license if the applicant submits a signed affidavit stating that the applicant has completed a course in hunter safety or that the applicant possessed such a hunting license previously. The person selling a hunting license shall record as specified by the department the form of proof of the previous hunting experience or certification of completion of hunter safety training presented by the applicant. This subsection does not apply to the issuance of an apprentice license or mentored hunting license. An apprentice license, mentored hunting license, or the equivalent does not satisfy the requirements of this subsection concerning proof of previous hunting experience. (3) An individual who does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) may obtain an apprentice license for the same price as the corresponding regular license that the individual would otherwise be qualified to obtain. An individual 17 years old or older shall not hunt game under an apprentice license unless another individual at least 21 years old who possesses a license, other than an apprentice license, to hunt that game accompanies that apprentice licensee and does not accompany more than 1 other apprentice licensee. For the purposes of this subsection and section 43517(1)(b), an individual shall not go along with more than 2 apprentice licensees of any age for the purpose of accompanying those apprentice licensees while those apprentice licensees are hunting. If an individual has represented to an apprentice licensee or, if the apprentice licensee is a minor child, to the apprentice licensee's parent or guardian that the individual would accompany the apprentice licensee for the purposes of this subsection, the individual shall not go along with the apprentice licensee while the apprentice licensee is hunting unless the individual actually accompanies the apprentice licensee and possesses a license, other than an apprentice license, to hunt the same game as the apprentice licensee. An individual is not eligible to obtain a specific type of apprentice license, such as a deer license, a base license, or a turkey license, for more than 2 license years. An apprentice license must be distinguished from a license other than an apprentice license by a notation or other means. (4) Only a minor who is less than 10 years old, a minor child with a developmental disability, or an adult who has a developmental disability and a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, may obtain a mentored hunting license. A minor who is less than 10 years old, a minor child with a developmental disability, or an adult who has a developmental disability and a guardian appointed under chapter 6 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1600 to 330.1644, shall not hunt game under a mentored hunting license unless that individual complies with all requirements of the mentored hunting program established by the commission under section 43517. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a mentored hunting license is $7.50. A mentored hunting license is free for an individual with a developmental disability. A mentored hunting license includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following: (a) Base license. (b) Deer license. (c) All-species fishing license. (c) (d) Spring wild turkey hunting license and fall wild turkey hunting license. (d) (e) Fur harvester's license. (6) An individual who purchases a mentored hunting license may apply for or purchase additional licenses pursuant to in accordance with current regulations, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Antlerless deer licenses under section 43527a. (b) A bear hunting license under section 43528. (c) An elk hunting license under section 43529. (7) An individual hunting with a license purchased under subsection (6) must comply with all requirements of the mentored hunting program established by the commission under section 43517. (8) By September 1, 2023 and every 4 years after that date, the department shall submit a report to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary responsibility for conservation and outdoor recreation issues evaluating whether the fee revenue received by the department from mentored hunting licenses under subsection (5) is adequate to administer the mentored hunting program. (9) As used in this section, "developmental disability" means that term as defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. Sec. 43523b. (1) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The fee for a resident combination hunt and fish license is $75.00 $78.00 and shall include includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following: (a) Resident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) All-species A general fishing license. (2) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The fee for a nonresident combination hunt and fish license is $265.00 $268.00 and shall include includes all of the privileges conferred by all of the following: (a) Nonresident base license. (b) Two deer licenses. (c) All-species A general fishing license. Sec. 43532. (1) An individual 16 years of age or older shall not take or possess an aquatic species, except aquatic insects, in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without a license. (2) (1) An all-species A general fishing license entitles the licensee to take and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law, other than chinook salmon, coho salmon, Atlantic salmon, steelhead, lake trout, brown trout, rainbow trout, walleye, splake, pike, lake sturgeon, and musky. The fee for a resident general fishing license is $28.00. The fee for a nonresident general fishing license is $78.00. (3) An individual shall not take or possess chinook salmon, coho salmon, Atlantic salmon, steelhead, lake trout, brown trout, rainbow trout, walleye, splake, pike, lake sturgeon, or musky without a hatchery stamp. The fee for a hatchery stamp is $5.00. All money generated under this subsection must be allocated to the fisheries division of the department and be used for aquatic species production and stocking, including aquatic species not listed in this subsection. (4) (2) An individual 17 years of age or older shall not take or possess an aquatic species, except aquatic insects, in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without an all-species fishing license. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a resident all-species fishing license is $25.00. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the fee for a nonresident all-species fishing license is $75.00. An individual under 17 years of age may take and possess aquatic species in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without an all-species fishing license. However, an individual under 17 years of age may obtain an all-species fishing license. The fee for a resident or nonresident who is under 17 years of age for an all-species fishing license is $2.00.Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual under 16 years of age may take and immediately release aquatic species in the waters over which this state has jurisdiction without a general fishing license. An individual under 12 years of age must possess a youth fishing license in order to possess an aquatic species harvested from the Great Lakes. An individual at least 12 years of age but less than 16 years of age must possess a youth fishing license in order to possess an aquatic species but may catch and immediately release aquatic species without a youth fishing license. The fee for a youth fishing license is $5.00. (5) (3) The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her all-species the individual's general fishing license using an electronic device. (6) The following amounts must be allocated to the fisheries division of the department: (a) Before January 1, 2029, the following: (i) 100% of the fees collected in subsections (2) and (4), section 43533, and section 43536. (ii) $28.00 of each license sold under section 43523b(1) and $78.00 of each license sold under section 43523b(2). (b) Beginning January 1, 2029, the following: (i) 80% of the fees collected in subsections (2) and (4), section 43533, and section 43536. (ii) $22.40 of each license sold under section 43523b(1) and $62.40 of each license sold under section 43523b(2). (7) The chief of the fisheries division of the department may recommend to the fisheries oversight committee to adjust the percentages in subsection (6). The fisheries oversight committee shall vote on whether to submit this request to the legislature. (8) For each license year, the chief of the fisheries division of the department shall present financial records of the fisheries division to the fisheries oversight committee and may make a recommendation for a general fishing license increase due to inflation. The fisheries oversight committee shall vote on whether to submit this request to the legislature. (9) As used in this section, "Great Lakes" means that term as defined in section 3101. Sec. 43532a. (1) The department shall charge an additional $1.00 for each of the following licenses: (a) A base license issued under sections 43523a(3) and 43535(2). (b) A combination hunt and fish license issued under section 43523b. (c) Except for those licenses purchased by individuals under 17 years of age, an all-species a general fishing license issued under sections 43532(2) and 43536(1). (2) The department shall deposit money generated under this section in the Michigan wildlife management public education subaccount created in section 43532b. Sec. 43533. (1) A resident or nonresident may purchase a 24-hour fishing license entitling that individual to take, for a designated 24-hour period, and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law. The fee for a 24-hour fishing license is $10.00 per designated consecutive 24-hour period.resident 24-hour fishing license is $12.00 per designated consecutive 24-hour period. The fee for a nonresident 24-hour fishing license is $17.00 per designated consecutive 24-hour period. (2) A resident or nonresident may purchase a 72-hour fishing license entitling that individual to take, for a designated 72-hour period, and possess all aquatic species as prescribed by law. The fee for a 72-hour fishing license is $30.00 per designated consecutive 72-hour period. (2) (3) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's 24-hour or 72-hour fishing license using an electronic device. Sec. 43536. (1) A resident of this state who is 65 years of age or older may obtain a senior all-species general fishing license. The fee for a senior all-species general fishing license is discounted the following amounts: (a) Before April 1, 2027, 60% from the fee for a resident all-species fishing license. (b) Beginning April 1, 2027, 50% from the fee for a resident license. (c) Beginning April 1, 2028, 40% from the fee for a resident license. (d) Beginning April 1, 2029, 30% from the fee for a resident license. (e) Beginning April 1, 2030, 20% from the fee for a resident license. (f) If the legislature does not appropriate from the general fund the amount required by section 43546(2), beginning on April 1 of that fiscal year, 20% of a resident license. (2) Not later than March 1, 2018, the The department shall develop an electronic license that allows an individual to display an electronic copy of his or her the individual's senior all-species general fishing license using an electronic device. Sec. 43537. (1) Until March 1, 2014, a resident who is declared legally blind is eligible to purchase a senior restricted or senior all-species fishing license. Beginning March 1, 2014, a A resident who is declared legally blind is eligible to purchase a senior all-species general fishing license. (2) A disabled veteran is eligible to obtain any resident license under this part for which a lottery is not required free of charge. (3) The department may demand proof of eligibility under subsection (1) , or (2). , or (4). The licensee, when taking aquatic species or hunting, shall possess proof of his or her the licensee's eligibility under subsection (1) , or (2), or (4), as applicable, and shall furnish the proof upon on the request of a peace officer. (4) The department shall process licenses issued under this section in the same manner as licenses issued to senior citizens for purposes of receiving appropriations from the legislature under section 43546. (5) As used in this section, "disabled veteran" means either of the following: (a) A resident who has been determined by the United States department Department of veterans affairs Veterans Affairs to be permanently and totally disabled as a result of military service and entitled to veterans' benefits at the 100% rate, for a disability other than blindness. (b) A resident rated by the United States department Department of veterans affairs Veterans Affairs as individually unemployable. Sec. 48703. (1) An individual shall not take, catch, or kill or attempt to take, catch, or kill a fish in the waters of this state with a grab hook, snag hook, or gaff hook, by the use of a set or night line or a net or firearm or an explosive substance or combination of substances that have a tendency to kill or stupefy fish, or by any other means or device other than a single line or a single rod and line while held in the hand or under immediate control, and with a hook or hooks attached, baited with a natural or artificial bait while being used for still fishing, ice fishing, casting, or trolling for fish, which is a means of the fish taking the bait or hook in the mouth. An Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual shall not use more than 3 single lines or 3 single rods and lines, or a single line and a single rod and line, and shall not attach more than 6 hooks on all lines. An individual who holds a hatchery stamp may use an unlimited number of rods when fishing from a moving boat on the Great Lakes. The commission may decrease the number of rods per angler. However, the commission shall not reduce the number of rods per angler to less than 2. For the purposes of this part, a hook is a single, double, or treble pointed hook. A hook, single, double, or treble pointed, attached to a manufactured artificial bait is counted as 1 hook. The commission may designate waters where a treble hook and an artificial bait or lure having more than 1 single pointed hook must not be used during the periods the commission designates. (2) An individual shall not set or use a tip-up or other similar device for the purpose of taking fish through the ice unless the name and address of the individual owning the tip-up or other similar device is marked in legible English on the tip-up or other similar device or securely fastened to it by a plate or tag. (3) The commission may issue an order to regulate the taking of fish with a spear, bow and arrow, or crossbow in the waters of this state. (4) The commission may issue an order to regulate the taking of fish with nets in the waters of this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect April 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H03464'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.